Illinois, session 104th, HB2985.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Works Jobs Program Act is amended 5by changing Sections 20-10, 20-15, 20-20, and 20-25 as 6follows: 7    (30 ILCS 559/20-10)8    Sec. 20-10. Definitions. 9    "Apprentice" means a participant in an apprenticeship 10program approved by and registered with the United States 11Department of Labor's Bureau of Apprenticeship and Training. 12For purposes of bid credit eligibility pursuant to Section 1320-15 of this Act, "apprentice" means an individual who (i) 14has completed the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program, 15(ii) is working in a construction and building trade, and 16(iii) has certification approved by the Department that the 17individual is anticipated to be a participant in an 18apprenticeship program approved by and registered with the 19United States Department of Labor's Bureau of Apprenticeship 20and Training within 12 months after completing the Illinois 21Works Preapprenticeship Program. 22    "Apprenticeship program" means an apprenticeship and 23training program approved by and registered with the United   HB2985- 2 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1States Department of Labor's Bureau of Apprenticeship and 2Training. 3    "Bid credit" means a virtual dollar for a contractor or 4subcontractor to use toward future bids on contracts with the 5State for public works projects. 6    "Community-based organization" means a nonprofit 7organization, including an accredited public college or 8university or a high school-based program, selected by the 9Department to participate in the Illinois Works 10Preapprenticeship Program. To qualify as a "community-based 11organization", the organization must demonstrate the 12following: 13        (1) the ability to effectively serve diverse and 14    underrepresented populations, including by providing 15    employment services to such populations;16        (2) knowledge of the construction and building trades;17        (3) the ability to recruit, prescreen, and provide 18    preapprenticeship training to prepare workers for 19    employment in the construction and building trades; and20        (4) a plan to provide the following:21            (A) preparatory classes;22            (B) workplace readiness skills, such as resume 23        preparation and interviewing techniques; 24            (C) strategies for overcoming barriers to entry 25        and completion of an apprenticeship program; and26            (D) any prerequisites for acceptance into an   HB2985- 3 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1        apprenticeship program. 2    "Contractor" means a person, corporation, partnership, 3limited liability company, or joint venture entering into a 4contract to construct a public work.5    "Department" means the Department of Commerce and Economic 6Opportunity.7    "Labor hours" means the total hours for workers who are 8receiving an hourly wage and who are directly employed for the 9public works project. "Labor hours" includes hours performed 10by workers employed by the contractor and subcontractors on 11the public works project. "Labor hours" does not include hours 12worked by the forepersons, superintendents, owners, and 13workers who are not subject to prevailing wage requirements. 14    "Minorities" means minority persons as defined in the 15Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, and Persons with 16Disabilities Act.17    "Public works" means all projects, contracted or funded by 18the State or any agency of the State, in whole or in part, from 19appropriated capital funds, that constitute public works under 20the Prevailing Wage Act.21    "Subcontractor" means a person, corporation, partnership, 22limited liability company, or joint venture that has 23contracted with the contractor to perform all or part of the 24work to construct a public work by a contractor. 25    "Underrepresented populations" means populations 26identified by the Department that historically have had   HB2985- 4 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1barriers to entry or advancement in the workforce. 2"Underrepresented populations" includes, but is not limited 3to, minorities, women, and veterans.4(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-601, eff. 12-10-19.) 5    (30 ILCS 559/20-15)6    Sec. 20-15. Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program; 7Illinois Works Bid Credit Program. 8    (a) The Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program is 9established and shall be administered by the Department. The 10goal of the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program is to 11create a network of community-based organizations throughout 12the State that will recruit, prescreen, and provide 13preapprenticeship skills training, for which participants may 14attend free of charge and receive a stipend, to create a 15qualified, diverse pipeline of workers who are prepared for 16careers in the construction and building trades. Upon 17completion of the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program, 18the candidates will be skilled and work-ready. 19    (b) There is created the Illinois Works Fund, a special 20fund in the State treasury. The Illinois Works Fund shall be 21administered by the Department. The Illinois Works Fund shall 22be used to provide funding for community-based organizations 23throughout the State. Such funding shall be categorized as 24follows: (i) funding for projects in Illinois Department of 25Transportation Region 1; (ii) funding for projects in Illinois   HB2985- 5 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1Department of Transportation Regions 2 and 3; and (iii) 2funding for projects in Illinois Department of Transportation 3Regions 4 and 5. In addition to any other transfers that may be 4provided for by law, on and after July 1, 2019 at the direction 5of the Director of the Governor's Office of Management and 6Budget, the State Comptroller shall direct and the State 7Treasurer shall transfer amounts not exceeding a total of 8$50,000,000 from the Rebuild Illinois Projects Fund to the 9Illinois Works Fund.10    (b-5) In addition to any other transfers that may be 11provided for by law, beginning July 1, 2024 and each July 1 12thereafter, or as soon thereafter as practical, the State 13Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 14transfer $20,000,000 from the Capital Projects Fund to the 15Illinois Works Fund. 16    (c) Each community-based organization that receives 17funding from the Illinois Works Fund shall provide an annual 18report to the Illinois Works Review Panel by April 1 of each 19calendar year. The annual report shall include the following 20information: 21        (1) a description of the community-based 22    organization's recruitment, screening, and training 23    efforts; 24        (2) the number of individuals who apply to, 25    participate in, and complete the community-based 26    organization's program, broken down by race, gender, age,   HB2985- 6 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1    and veteran status; and2    (3) the number of the individuals referenced in item (2) 3    of this subsection who are initially accepted and placed 4    into apprenticeship programs in the construction and 5    building trades. 6    (d) The Department shall create and administer the 7Illinois Works Bid Credit Program that shall provide economic 8incentives, through bid credits, to encourage contractors and 9subcontractors to provide contracting and employment 10opportunities to historically underrepresented populations in 11the construction industry. 12    The Illinois Works Bid Credit Program shall allow 13contractors and subcontractors to earn bid credits for use 14toward future bids for public works projects contracted by the 15State or an agency of the State in order to increase the 16chances that the contractor and the subcontractors will be 17selected.18    Contractors or subcontractors may be eligible to earn bid 19credits for employing apprentices who have completed the 20Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program. Contractors or 21subcontractors shall earn bid credits at a rate established by 22the Department and based on labor hours worked by apprentices 23who have completed the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship 24Program. In order to earn bid credits, contractors and 25subcontractors shall provide the Department with certified 26payroll documenting the hours performed by apprentices who   HB2985- 7 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1have completed the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program. 2Contractors and subcontractors can use bid credits toward 3future bids for public works projects contracted or funded by 4the State or an agency of the State in order to increase the 5likelihood of being selected as the contractor for the public 6works project toward which they have applied the bid credit. 7The Department shall establish the rate by rule and shall 8publish it on the Department's website. The rule may include 9maximum bid credits allowed per contractor, per subcontractor, 10per apprentice, per bid, or per year. 11    The Illinois Works Credit Bank is hereby created and shall 12be administered by the Department. The Illinois Works Credit 13Bank shall track the bid credits. 14    A contractor or subcontractor who has been awarded bid 15credits under any other State program for employing 16apprentices who have completed the Illinois Works 17Preapprenticeship Program is not eligible to receive bid 18credits under the Illinois Works Bid Credit Program relating 19to the same contract.20    The Department shall report to the Illinois Works Review 21Panel the following: (i) the number of bid credits awarded by 22the Department; (ii) the number of bid credits submitted by 23the contractor or subcontractor to the agency administering 24the public works contract; and (iii) the number of bid credits 25accepted by the agency for such contract. Any agency that 26awards bid credits pursuant to the Illinois Works Credit Bank   HB2985- 8 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1Program shall report to the Department the number of bid 2credits it accepted for the public works contract.3    Upon a finding that a contractor or subcontractor has 4reported falsified records to the Department in order to 5fraudulently obtain bid credits, the Department may bar the 6contractor or subcontractor from participating in the Illinois 7Works Bid Credit Program and may suspend the contractor or 8subcontractor from bidding on or participating in any public 9works project. False or fraudulent claims for payment relating 10to false bid credits may be subject to damages and penalties 11under applicable law. 12    (e) Subject to approval of the Department, community-based 13organizations may be authorized to provide high school-based 14preapprenticeship programming, which may include participants 15under the age of 18 and be subject to preapprenticeship 16program completion requirements consistent with the 17participant's school year and related attendance. 18    (f) (e) The Department shall adopt any rules deemed 19necessary to implement this Section. In order to provide for 20the expeditious and timely implementation of this Act, the 21Department may adopt emergency rules. The adoption of 22emergency rules authorized by this subsection is deemed to be 23necessary for the public interest, safety, and welfare.24(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-305, eff. 7-28-23; 25103-588, eff. 6-5-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24.)   HB2985- 9 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1    (30 ILCS 559/20-20)2    Sec. 20-20. Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative. 3    (a) The Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative is 4established and shall be administered by the Department. 5        (1) Subject to the exceptions set forth in subsection 6    (b) of this Section, apprentices shall be utilized on all 7    public works projects estimated to cost $500,000 or more 8    in accordance with this subsection (a). 9        (2) For public works projects estimated to cost 10    $500,000 or more, the goal of the Illinois Works 11    Apprenticeship Initiative is that apprentices will perform 12    either 10% of the total labor hours actually worked in 13    each prevailing wage classification or 10% of the 14    estimated labor hours in each prevailing wage 15    classification, whichever is less. For contracts and grant 16    agreements executed after the effective date of this 17    amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly and before 18    January 1, 2024, of this goal, at least 25% of the labor 19    hours of each prevailing wage classification performed by 20    apprentices shall be performed by graduates of the 21    Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program, the Illinois 22    Climate Works Preapprenticeship Program, or the Highway 23    Construction Careers Training Program. For contracts and 24    grant agreements executed on or after January 1, 2024, of 25    this goal, at least 50% of the labor hours of each 26    prevailing wage classification performed by apprentices   HB2985- 10 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1    shall be performed by graduates of the Illinois Works 2    Preapprenticeship Program, the Illinois Climate Works 3    Preapprenticeship Program, or the Highway Construction 4    Careers Training Program. 5    (b) Before or during the term of a contract subject to this 6Section, the Department may reduce or waive the goals set 7forth in paragraph (2) of subsection (a). Prior to the 8Department granting a request for a reduction or waiver, the 9Department shall determine, in its discretion, whether to hold 10a public hearing on the request. In determining whether to 11hold a public hearing, the Department may consider factors, 12including the scale of the project and whether the contractor 13or subcontractor seeking the reduction or waiver has 14previously requested reductions or waivers on other projects. 15The Department may also consult with the Business Enterprise 16Council under the Business Enterprise for Minorities, Women, 17and Persons with Disabilities Act and the Chief Procurement 18Officer of the agency administering the public works contract. 19The Department may grant a reduction or waiver upon a 20determination that: 21        (1) the contractor or subcontractor has demonstrated 22    that insufficient apprentices are available; 23        (2) the reasonable and necessary requirements of the 24    contract do not allow the goal to be met;25        (3) there is a disproportionately high ratio of 26    material costs to labor hours that makes meeting the goal   HB2985- 11 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1    infeasible;2        (4) apprentice labor hour goals conflict with existing 3    requirements, including federal requirements, in 4    connection with the public work; or 5        (5) the contractor or subcontractor has demonstrated 6    that insufficient graduates of the Illinois Works 7    Preapprenticeship Program are available to meet the 8    requirements of paragraph (2) of subsection (a). 9    (c) Contractors and subcontractors must submit a 10certification to the Department and the agency that is 11administering the contract, or the grant agreement funding the 12contract, demonstrating that the contractor or subcontractor 13has:14        (1) met the apprentice labor hour goals set forth in 15    paragraph (2) of subsection (a); 16        (2) received a reduction or waiver pursuant to 17    subsection (b); or 18        (3) not complied with the labor hour goals in 19    paragraph (2) of subsection (a) and did not receive a 20    reduction or waiver pursuant to subsection (b). 21    It shall be deemed to be a material breach of the contract, 22or the grant agreement funding the contract, and entitle the 23State to declare a default, terminate the contract or grant 24agreement funding it, and exercise those remedies provided for 25in the contract, at law, or in equity if the contractor or 26subcontractor fails to submit the certification required in   HB2985- 12 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1this subsection or submits false or misleading information. 2    Intentional failure to comply with the Illinois Works 3Apprenticeship Initiative may result in the State agency that 4contracted or funded the public works project: (i) terminating 5the contract or agreement involved, (ii) prohibiting the party 6that contracted with the State from participating in public 7contracts or agreements for a period not to exceed 3 years, 8(iii) seeking a penalty of up to 25% of the contract or 9agreement as a result of the violation, or (iv) any 10combination of items (i) through (iii). State agencies shall 11report to the Department all projects that did not comply with 12the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative and any action 13taken against the noncompliant party and shall provide an 14action plan to address the reported instance of noncompliance 15with the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative. 16    (d) No later than one year after the effective date of this 17Act, and by April 1 of every calendar year thereafter, the 18Department of Labor shall submit a report to the Illinois 19Works Review Panel regarding the use of apprentices under the 20Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative for public works 21projects. To the extent it is available, the report shall 22include the following information: 23        (1) the total number of labor hours on each project 24    and the percentage of labor hours actually worked by 25    apprentices on each public works project; 26        (2) the number of apprentices used in each public   HB2985- 13 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1    works project, broken down by trade; and 2        (3) the number and percentage of minorities, women, 3    and veterans utilized as apprentices on each public works 4    project. 5    (e) The Department shall adopt any rules deemed necessary 6to implement the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative. In 7order to provide for the expeditious and timely implementation 8of this Act, the Department may adopt emergency rules. The 9adoption of emergency rules authorized by this subsection is 10deemed to be necessary for the public interest, safety, and 11welfare. 12    (f) The Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative shall not 13interfere with any contracts or grants in existence on the 14effective date of this Act. 15    (g) Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in this 16Act, any State agency that administers a construction program 17for which federal law or regulations establish standards and 18procedures for the utilization of apprentices may implement 19the Illinois Works Apprenticeship Initiative using the federal 20standards and procedures for the establishment of goals and 21utilization procedures for the State-funded, as well as the 22federally assisted, portions of the program. In such cases, 23these goals shall not exceed those established pursuant to the 24relevant federal statutes or regulations.25    (h) The Department shall maintain a list of graduates of 26the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program for a period of   HB2985- 14 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1not less than one year after the participant graduates from 2the Program. The list shall include the name, address, county 3of residence, phone number, email address, and the 4self-attested construction and building trade career path 5preferences of each graduate. This list shall be made 6available to any contractor or subcontractor, as well as any 7apprenticeship program approved by and registered with the 8United States Department of Labor's Bureau of Apprenticeship 9and Training in alignment with the graduate's self-attested 10construction and building trade career path preferences. 11Subject to approval of the Department, community-based 12organizations may be authorized to provide services pursuant 13to this subsection (h) of Section 20-20 of this Act. 14(Source: P.A. 103-305, eff. 7-28-23.) 15    (30 ILCS 559/20-25)16    Sec. 20-25. The Illinois Works Review Panel. 17    (a) The Illinois Works Review Panel is created and shall 18be comprised of 26 25 members, each serving 3-year terms. The 19Speaker of the House of Representatives and the President of 20the Senate shall each appoint 5 members within 30 days after 21the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 22Assembly. The Minority Leader of the House of Representatives 23and the Minority Leader of the Senate shall each appoint 5 24members within 30 days after the effective date of this 25amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly. The Director of   HB2985- 15 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1Commerce and Economic Opportunity, or his or her designee, 2shall serve as a member. The Governor shall appoint the 3following individuals to serve as members within 30 days after 4the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 5Assembly: a representative from a contractor organization; a 6representative from a labor organization; and 3 2 members of 7the public with workforce development expertise, one of whom 8shall be a representative of a nonprofit organization that 9addresses workforce development and one of whom shall be a 10representative of a community-based organization that 11addresses high school-based workforce programs. 12    (b) The members of the Illinois Works Review Panel shall 13make recommendations to the Department regarding 14identification and evaluation of community-based 15organizations. 16    (c) The Illinois Works Review Panel shall meet, at least 17quarterly, to review and evaluate (i) the Illinois Works 18Preapprenticeship Program and the Illinois Works 19Apprenticeship Initiative, (ii) ideas to diversify the trainee 20corps in the Illinois Works Preapprenticeship Program and the 21workforce in the construction industry in Illinois, (iii) 22ideas to increase diversity in active apprenticeship programs 23in Illinois, and (iv) workforce demographic data collected by 24the Illinois Department of Labor, and (v) Office of Illinois 25Works appeal decisions regarding community-based organization 26performance appeals. The Illinois Works Review Panel shall   HB2985- 16 -LRB104 09976 HLH 20046 b1hold its initial meeting no later than 45 days after the 2effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 3Assembly. 4    (d) All State contracts and grant agreements funding State 5contracts shall include a requirement that the contractor and 6subcontractor shall, upon reasonable notice, appear before and 7respond to requests for information from the Illinois Works 8Review Panel. 9    (e) By August 1, 2020, and every August 1 thereafter, the 10Illinois Works Review Panel shall report to the General 11Assembly on its evaluation of the Illinois Works 12Preapprenticeship Program and the Illinois Works 13Apprenticeship Initiative, including any recommended 14modifications.15(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-601, eff. 12-10-19; 16101-633, eff. 6-5-20.)